Maryland, session 2025, HB1419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–1005.
(a) The Commission shall develop a program for each investor–owned electric
company to establish a pilot program or temporary tariff to compensate owners and
aggregators of distributed energy resources for electric distribution system support services
through an incentive mechanism determined by the Commission.
(G) A PERSON OR COMPANY PARTICIPATING AS AN AGGREGATOR OF
DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES IN A PILOT PROGRAM APPROVED UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED AN ELECTRIC COMPANY OR ELECTRICITY
SUPPLIER SOLELY BECAUSE OF THE PERSON’S OR COMPANY’S PARTICIPATION IN
THE PROGRAM.
(H) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY, PRIVATE ENTITY, OR AGGREGATOR OF DISTRIBUTED ENERGY
RESOURCES FROM OFFERING ENERGY STORAGE TO RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS
SEPARATE FROM THE PILOT PROGRAM OR TEMPORARY TARIFF.
(I) ON REQUEST OF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY, THE COMMISSION SHALL
AUTHORIZE THE ELECTRIC COMPANY TO USE USAGE DATA AND PRODUCTION DATA
COLLECTED FROM CUSTOMER–OWNED DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OF A PILOT PROGRAM OR TEMPORARY TARIFF ESTABLISHED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
7–1007.
(a) An investor–owned electric company may recover all reasonable costs incurred
in:
(1) participating in and administering a program under § 7–1005 of this
subtitle; and

HOUSE BILL 1419 3
(2) offering an upfront incentive or rebate under § 7–1006 of this subtitle.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE COSTS LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE GOALS OF §§ 7–1005 AND 7–1006 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE THE USE OF REGULATORY ASSET
ACCOUNTING IN RECOVERING THE COSTS.
(C) To the extent feasible, the costs listed in subsection (a) of this section shall be
recovered by the investor–owned electric company within the calendar year in which those
costs were incurred.
[(c)] (D) Notwithstanding any provision of this subtitle, an investor–owned
electric company may pursue and use a performance incentive mechanism to cover the cost
of using distributed energy resources or an aggregator of distributed ENERGY resources
under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The General Assembly finds that the use of distributed energy storage in the
State would provide reliability and electric system benefits in Maryland.
(b) By January 1, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall evaluate programs
enacted in other states to facilitate the installation of energy storage within homes and
businesses.
(c) After completing the evaluation required under subsection (b) of this section,
the Commission shall coordinate with electric companies and other stakeholders to design,
by June 1, 2026, programs to advance and expand home– and business–sited energy storage
in the State.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.